Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.260

Mailing. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

As soon as practicable before the primary, special election, or general election, the county auditor, or if applicable, the city clerk of a first-class or code city, as appropriate, shall mail the local voters' pamphlet to every residence in each jurisdiction that has included information in the pamphlet. The county auditor or city clerk, as appropriate, may choose to mail the pamphlet to each registered voter in each jurisdiction that has included information in the pamphlet, if in his or her judgment, a more economical and effective distribution of the pamphlet would result. The county auditor shall either mail or send a printable electronic version of the state and local voters' pamphlets to any service or overseas voter registered in the jurisdiction who has requested them.

[ 2022 c 193 s 2; 2011 c 10 s 30; 2003 c 111 s 818. Prior: 1984 c 106 s 8. Formerly RCW 29.81A.060.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2022 c 193: "The legislature finds that service and overseas voters have the right to vote for their elected officials. To effectuate this right, service and overseas voters must have access to the same ballot materials as voters present in the state with sufficient time to thoughtfully consider candidates and issues before casting a ballot. Accordingly, the legislature intends to ensure that voters' pamphlets are available to service and overseas voters at the same time as the ballot." [ 2022 c 193 s 1.]

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

PDFRCW 29A.32.260

Mailing. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

As soon as practicable before the primary, special election, or general election, the county auditor shall mail the local voters' pamphlet to every residence in each jurisdiction within the county that is participating in the associated primary or election and for which election information is included in the pamphlet. The county auditor may choose to mail the pamphlet to each registered voter in each jurisdiction within the county that is participating in the associated primary or election and for which election information is included in the pamphlet, if in the auditor's judgment, a more economical and effective distribution of the pamphlet would result. The county auditor shall either mail or send a printable electronic version of the state and local voters' pamphlets to any service or overseas voter registered in the jurisdiction who has requested them.

[ 2024 c 78 s 11; 2022 c 193 s 2; 2011 c 10 s 30; 2003 c 111 s 818. Prior: 1984 c 106 s 8. Formerly RCW 29.81A.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.

Finding—Intent—2022 c 193: "The legislature finds that service and overseas voters have the right to vote for their elected officials. To effectuate this right, service and overseas voters must have access to the same ballot materials as voters present in the state with sufficient time to thoughtfully consider candidates and issues before casting a ballot. Accordingly, the legislature intends to ensure that voters' pamphlets are available to service and overseas voters at the same time as the ballot." [ 2022 c 193 s 1.]

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.